Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1698XS (3) 91 je/js S.F. 134 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 216.23 Reasonable accommodations to 1 employees ââ pregnancy or childbirth. 2 1. An employer shall provide reasonable accommodations 3 to an employee based on medical conditions related to the 4 employeeâs pregnancy or childbirth if the employee so requests 5 with the advice of the employeeâs health care provider. 6 2. For purposes of this section, âreasonable accommodationsâ 7 means actions which would permit an employee with a medical 8 condition relating to the employeeâs pregnancy or childbirth to 9 perform in a reasonable manner the activities involved in the 10 employeeâs specific occupation and include but are not limited 11 to the provision of an accessible worksite, acquisition or 12 modification of equipment, job restructuring, and a modified 13 work schedule. âReasonable accommodationsâ does not mean any 14 action that would impose an undue hardship on the business of 15 the employer from whom the action is requested. 16 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 216.24 Penalties. 17 An employer who violates section 216.23 is subject to a civil 18 penalty of up to seven hundred fifty dollars. 19 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 216.25 Duties and authority of the 20 director. 21 1. The director shall adopt rules to implement and enforce 22 section 216.23 and shall provide exemptions from the provisions 23 of section 216.23 where reasonable. 24 2. In order to carry out the purposes of section 216.23, 25 the director or the directorâs representative, upon presenting 26 appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in 27 charge, may: 28 a. Inspect employment records relating to the total number 29 of employees and pregnant employees or employees recovering 30 from childbirth, and the services provided to pregnant 31 employees or employees recovering from childbirth. 32 b. Interview an employer, owner, operator, agent, or 33 employee, during working hours or at other reasonable times. 34 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 216.26 Collective bargaining 35 -1- LSB 1698XS (3) 91 je/js 1/ 3 S.F. 134 agreements. 1 Compliance with the minimum standards required in section 2 216.23 shall not be subject to or considered in collective 3 bargaining. 4